Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Organization and Officers

7-57-201. Creation of hospital authorities.

The governing body of the creating municipality may establish a metropolitan hospital authority in the manner provided for in this part.

The governing body of the creating municipality shall adopt, and its executive officer shall approve, a resolution calling a public hearing on the question of creating a metropolitan hospital authority. Notice of the date, hour, place and purpose of such hearing shall be published at least once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the creating municipality, the last such publication to be at least one (1) week prior to the date set for the hearing.

Such hearing shall be had before the governing body and all interested persons shall have an opportunity to be heard.

After such hearing, if the governing body determines that the public convenience and necessity requires the creation of a metropolitan hospital authority, it shall adopt, and its executive officer shall approve, a resolution so declaring and creating an authority, which resolution shall also designate the name and principal office address of the authority. A certified copy of such resolution shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the commissioner of health, together with the resolution approving the appointment of the board of trustees as provided for in § 7-57-203, and upon such adoption and filing, the authority shall constitute a body politic and corporate, with all the powers pursuant to this chapter, and the secretary of state shall make and issue to the board of trustees a certificate of incorporation pursuant to this chapter, under the seal of the state, and shall record the certificate of incorporation, together with the resolution of the governing body of the municipality creating the authority.

The boundaries of any authority created under this chapter shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the creating or participating municipality, whichever is inclusive of the other.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of or related to any contract of an authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with this chapter upon proof of the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the secretary of state. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the secretary of state, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action or proceeding, and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents of the certificate.

Whenever an authority shall be created under this chapter, the creating municipality and any participating municipality may enter into an agreement with the authority for the orderly transfer to the authority of the hospital properties, functions, and outstanding obligations of such municipalities in connection with the authority. Such agreement may include provisions for the reimbursement of any such municipality for its obligations issued for hospital purposes, and such agreement may also include provisions for the payment to the creating or participating municipalities of tax equivalents by the authority and its lessees on all or any part of the properties and improvements conveyed to or owned by the authority or its lessees.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-4004; Acts 1991, ch. 442, § 1.

Cross-References. Payment of tax equivalents, §7-57-307.

7-57-202. Change of name.

An authority created and existing pursuant to this chapter may, at any time, by resolution adopted by a majority of its board of trustees, change its name. A copy of such resolution, duly verified by the chair and secretary of the board of trustees before an officer authorized by the laws of this state to administer oaths, shall be delivered to the secretary of state, together with a conformed copy of the resolution. If the secretary of state determines that the proposed name is not identical with that of any other corporation of this state, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall receive and file it and record it in an appropriate book of record in the secretary of state's office, and thereupon return to the authority the conformed copy, together with a certificate stating that attached to the certificate is a true copy of the document filed in the secretary of state's office and showing the date of such filing.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-4005.

7-57-203. Board of trustees.

The governing body of an authority shall be a board of trustees to consist of no fewer than five (5) nor more than fifteen (15) members. All powers granted to an authority in this chapter shall be exercised by its board of trustees. The governing body of the creating municipality, or if two (2) or more creating municipalities act in concert to create a hospital authority, then the governing bodies of the several creating municipalities, by agreement between themselves and subject to the approval of their executive officers, are hereby authorized, within the limitations imposed by this chapter, to establish the number of members of the board of trustees, their method of nomination and appointment, their tenure of service, and such other qualifications in addition to those set forth in this section as the creating municipality or municipalities may desire to impose. The agreement shall be evidenced by a resolution passed by the governing body or bodies of the creating municipality or municipalities acting together in the creation of an authority. A creating municipality may likewise enter into similar agreements with participating municipalities concerning the number, appointment, tenure of service, and qualifications of the board of trustees of an authority. In each and every case, a trustee shall be nominated by the executive officer and approved by the governing body of the municipality that appoints such person to the board of trustees, and such person shall be a resident of such municipality.

The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to be reimbursed for necessary expenses, including travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties.

The board shall elect from among its members, by a majority vote of the entire board, a chair and vice chair, each of whom shall continue to be voting members.

The board shall adopt its own bylaws. Notice of any meeting to adopt or amend the bylaws must be sent by registered mail to each of the trustees at least ten (10) days prior to the date of such meeting, such notice to contain the time, place and purpose of the meeting. Bylaws may be adopted or amended only upon the affirmative vote of two thirds (2/3) of the members of the board.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-4006.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

7-57-204. Pecuniary interest of trustees or employees in hospital facilities or contracts.

No trustee or employee of an authority shall, during such person's tenure as such trustee or employee, acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any hospital facility or in any property included or planned to be included in any hospital facility; nor shall such person have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used in connection with any hospital facility. If any trustee or employee of an authority owns or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or planned to be included in any hospital facility, such person shall immediately disclose the interest in writing to the authority, and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. Failure to so disclose such interest shall constitute misconduct in office, for which the trustee or employee may be removed by the governing bodies of the appropriate creating and participating municipalities.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-4008.